tr: Su tabancası püskürtme deseni: Ayarlanabilir desen; Seri atış/darbeli; Yelpaze püskürtme; Sis püskürtme; Çoklu jet akışı; Duş püskürtme; Tekli jet akışı; Diğer
pl: Wzór strumienia wody z pistoletu na wodę: Regulowany strumień; Pulsacyjny/seriami; Strumień płaski; Mgiełka; Wielostrumieniowy; Prysznic; Pojedynczy strumień; Inne
it: Getto della pistola ad acqua: Getto regolabile; Raffica/impulso; Getto a ventaglio; Getto nebulizzato; Getto multiplo; Getto a doccia; Getto singolo; Altro
fi: Vesipistoolin suihkukuvio: Säädettävä kuvio; Purske/pulssi; Viuhkasuihku; Sumusuihku; Monisuihku; Suihku; Yksittäinen vesisuihku; Muu
sk-SK: Vzor striekania vodnej pištole: Nastaviteľný prúd; Dávky/impulzy; Vejárový prúd; Rozprašovač; Viacnásobný prúd; Sprchový prúd; Jeden prúd; Iný
ro-RO: Modelul de pulverizare al pistolului cu apă: Model de pulverizare reglabil; În rafale / Pulsat; Pulverizare evantai; Pulverizare fină; Jet multiplu; Pulverizare tip duș; Jet unic; Altele
sv: Vattenpistolens sprutmönster: Justerbart mönster; Skur/puls; Bred stråle; Dimspray; Flerstrålig; Duschstråle; Enkel stråle; Övrigt
ru: Тип струи водяного пистолета: Регулируемая струя; Очередь/пульсация; Веерное распыление; Мелкое распыление; Многоструйное распыление; Режим душа; Одиночная струя; Другое
en: Water gun spray pattern: Adjustable pattern; Burst/pulse; Fan spray; Mist spray; Multi-jet stream; Shower spray; Single jet stream; Other
hr-HR: Uzorak prskanja vodenog pištolja: Podesivi uzorak; Rafal/pulsiranje; Lepezasto raspršivanje; Raspršivanje u maglici; Višestruki mlaz; Tuš-raspršivanje; Jednostruki mlaz; Ostalo
lt-LT: Vandens pistoleto purškimo schema: Reguliuojamas raštas; Pliūpsnis / pulsavimas; Vėduoklinis purškimas; Dulksnos purškimas; Kelių srovių; Dušo purškimas; Vienos srovės; Kita
sl-SI: Vzorec pršenja vodne pištole: Prilagodljiv vzorec; Sunek/pulz; Pahljačasto pršenje; Pršenje megle; Več curkov; Prhanje; Enojni curek; Drugo
nb: Vannpistolens spraymønster: Justerbart mønster; Støt/puls; Viftespray; Tåkespray; Flerstråle; Dusjspray; Enkeltstråle; Annet
de: Sprühmuster der Wasserpistole: Einstellbares Sprühbild; Stoß/Pulsierend; Fächerstrahl; Sprühnebel; Mehrfachstrahl; Duschstrahl; Einzelstrahl; Sonstige
pt-BR: Como a pistola de água pressuriza e expele água durante o uso.: Padrão ajustável; Rajada/pulso; Spray em leque; Spray de névoa; Jato múltiplo; Spray de chuveiro; Jato único; Outros
vi: Kiểu phun của súng nước: Kiểu phun có thể điều chỉnh; Bắn loạt/theo nhịp; Phun hình quạt; Phun sương; Nhiều tia; Phun như vòi sen; Một tia; Khác
zh-CN: 水枪喷射模式: 可调模式; 点射/脉冲; 扇形喷雾; 雾状喷雾; 多水柱射流; 花洒喷雾; 单水柱射流; 其他
el: Μοτίβο ψεκασμού με πιστόλι νερού: Ρυθμιζόμενο μοτίβο; Ριπές/παλμοί; Ψεκασμός βεντάλιας; Ψεκασμός νέφους; Πολλαπλή ροή; Ψεκασμός ντους; Μονή ροή; Άλλο
ko: 물총 분사 패턴: 조절 가능 패턴; 버스트/펄스; 팬 분사; 미스트 분사; 멀티 제트 스트림; 샤워 분사; 싱글 제트 스트림; 기타
cs: Tvar proudu vody z pistole: Nastavitelný vzor; Dávky/pulzy; Vějířový paprsek; Mlhový rozprašovač; Více paprsků; Sprcha; Jeden paprsek; Jiné
pt-PT: Padrão de pulverização da pistola de água: Padrão ajustável; Disparo/pulso; Jato em leque; Pulverização em névoa; Jato múltiplo; Pulverização em chuveiro; Jato único; Outro
th: รูปแบบการฉีดน้ำของปืนฉีดน้ำ: ปรับรูปแบบได้; ยิงเป็นชุด/จังหวะ; ละอองแบบพัด; ละอองฝอย; น้ำหลายสาย; ละอองฝักบัว; น้ำสายเดียว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 水槍噴水模式: 可調式水花; 點射/脈衝; 扇形噴射; 霧狀噴射; 多股水柱; 花灑噴射; 單股水柱; 其他
nl: Waterpistool sproeipatroon: Verstelbaar patroon; Burst/puls; Waaiervormige straal; Nevelstraal; Meervoudige straal; Douchestraal; Enkele straal; Overige
da: Sprøjtemønster for vandpistol: Justerbart mønster; Byge/puls; Viftestråle; Tågestråle; Multistråle; Bruserstråle; Enkelt stråle; Andet
ja: 水鉄砲噴射パターン: 調整可能なパターン; バースト/パルス; ファンスプレー; ミストスプレー; マルチジェットストリーム; シャワースプレー; シングルジェットストリーム; その他
fr: Type de jet du pistolet à eau: Jet réglable; Rafale/impulsion; Jet en éventail; Brumisateur; Multijet; Jet de douche; Jet simple; Autre
hu: Vízipisztoly szórásképe: Állítható szóráskép; Sorozat/impulzus; Legyező alakú szórás; Permetszórás; Többsugaras; Zuhanyszórás; Egysugaras; Egyéb
bg-BG: Модел на водната струя на водния пистолет: Регулируема струя; Импулсна/на пресекулки струя; Ветрилообразна струя; Фина мъгла; Многоструйна; Струя тип душ; Единична струя; Друго
es: Patrón de pulverización de la pistola de agua: Patrón ajustable; Ráfaga/pulso; Rocío en abanico; Rocío fino; Chorro múltiple; Rocío tipo ducha; Chorro único; Otro